th: ประเภทโครงสร้างแบบท่อ: แฮนด์เมด; แบบเปิด; มาตรฐาน; ไม่มียางใน; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tip de construcție tubulară: Realizat manual; Deschis; Standard; Tubeless; Altele
sk-SK: Typ rúrkovitej konštrukcie: Ručne vyrobené; Otvorené; Štandardné; Bezdušové; Iný
nl: Tubulaire constructievorm: Handgemaakt; Open; Standaard; Tubeless; Anders
vi: Kiểu kết cấu dạng ống: Hàng thủ công; Mở; Tiêu chuẩn; Không săm; Khác
nb: Rørformet konstruksjonstype: Håndlaget; Åpen; Standard; Tubeless; Annet
bg-BG: Тип тръбна конструкция: Ръчна изработка; Отворена; Стандартна; Безкамерна; Друга
de: Bau art des Schlauchreifens: Handgefertigt; Offen; Standard; Tubeless; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Tipo de estrutura tubular: Artesanal; Aberto; Padrão; Sem câmara; Outro
it: Tipo di costruzione tubolare: Fatto a mano; Aperto; Standard; Tubeless; Altro
pt-PT: Tipo de construção tubular: Artesanal; Aberto; Padrão; Tubeless; Outro
zh-CN: 管胎结构类型: 手工; 开放式; 标准; 真空胎; 其他
fi: Tuubirenkaan rakennetyyppi: Käsintehty; Avoin; Vakio; Tubeless; Muu
lt-LT: Kameros konstrukcijos tipas: Rankų darbo; Atvira; Standartinė; Bekamerinė; Kita
hu: Csővázas kialakítás típusa: Kézzel készült; Nyitott; Normál; Tubeless; Egyéb
el: Τύπος σωληνωτής κατασκευής: Χειροποίητη; Ανοιχτή; Τυπική; Χωρίς σαμπρέλα; Άλλο
es: Tipo de construcción tubular: Hecho a mano; Abierto; Estándar; Tubeless; Otro
sl-SI: Vrsta tabularne izdelave: Ročno izdelano; Odprto; Standardno; Brez zračnice; Drugo
fr: Type de construction tubulaire: Fait main; Ouvert; Standard; Tubeless; Autre
pl: Typ konstrukcji tubularnej: Wykonanie ręczne; Otwarte; Standardowe; Bezdętkowe; Inne
ko: 튜블러 구조 유형: 핸드 메이드; 오픈; 표준; 튜블리스; 기타
da: Konstruktionstype for tubulardæk: Håndlavet; Åben; Standard; Tubeless; Andet
ru: Тип трубчатой конструкции: Ручная работа; Открытые; Стандартные; Бескамерные; Другое
ja: 管状構造タイプ: ハンドメイド; オープン; スタンダード; チューブレス; その他
cs: Typ trubkové konstrukce: Ruční výroba; Otevřená konstrukce; Standardní; Bezdušové; Ostatní
zh-TW: 管狀結構類型: 手工製作; 開放式; 標準; 無內胎; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta cijevne konstrukcije: Ručno izrađeno; Otvoreno; Standardno; Tubeless; Ostalo
en: Tubular construction type: Handmade; Open; Standard; Tubeless; Other
sv: Typ av rörkonstruktion: Handgjord; Öppen; Standard; Tubeless; Annat
tr: Boru tipi yapı türü: El yapımı; Açık; Standart; Tubeless; Diğer